Hawaii statutes.
§672E-5 Written notice of acceptance;
access to premises. (a) The claimant, within thirty days after receipt of
a contractor's settlement offer, may accept any offer by serving the contractor
with a written notice of acceptance; provided that an association shall have
forty-five days to respond. If no written notice of acceptance is served, the
settlement offer shall be deemed rejected.

(b) If a claimant accepts a contractor's offer
to repair, the claimant shall provide unfettered access to perform and complete
the construction within the timetable stated in the settlement offer. [L 2004,
c 119, pt of §2; am L 2005, c 22, §43]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next